trunk/incubator/apertium-en-ga.ga.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet></alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>

    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>

    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    
    <sdef n="len" c="lenition ~~ séimhiú"/>
    <sdef n="ecl" c="eclipsis ~~ urú"/>
    <sdef n="tpro" c="T prothetic"/>
    <sdef n="hpro" c="H prothetic"/>
    
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="voc"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="dat"/>
    
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>

    <sdef n="n"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

    <!-- Initial mutations -->
    <pardef n="b_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>b</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bh</l>
          <r>b<s n="len"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mb</l>
          <r>b<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="c_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>c</l>
          <r>c</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ch</l>
          <r>c<s n="len"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gc</l>
          <r>c<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dh</l>
          <r>d<s n="len"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nd</l>
          <r>d<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
          <r>f</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fh</l>
          <r>f<s n="len"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bhf</l>
          <r>f<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="g_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r>g</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gh</l>
          <r>g<s n="len"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ng</l>
          <r>g<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>m</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mh</l>
          <r>m<s n="len"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="p_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>p</l>
          <r>p</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ph</l>
          <r>p<s n="len"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bp</l>
          <r>p<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sh</l>
          <r>s<s n="len"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ts</l>
          <r>s<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>th</l>
          <r>t<s n="len"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dt</l>
          <r>t<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="a_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n-a</l>
          <r>a<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nA</l>
          <r>A<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t-a</l>
          <r>a<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tA</l>
          <r>A<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ha</l>
          <r>a<s n="hpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="á_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>á</l>
          <r>á</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n-á</l>
          <r>á<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nÁ</l>
          <r>Á<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t-á</l>
          <r>á<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tÁ</l>
          <r>Á<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>há</l>
          <r>á<s n="hpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n-e</l>
          <r>e<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nE</l>
          <r>E<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t-e</l>
          <r>e<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tE</l>
          <r>E<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>he</l>
          <r>e<s n="hpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="é_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>é</l>
          <r>é</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n-é</l>
          <r>é<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nÉ</l>
          <r>É<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t-é</l>
          <r>é<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tÉ</l>
          <r>É<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hé</l>
          <r>é<s n="hpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="i_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n-i</l>
          <r>i<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nI</l>
          <r>I<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t-i</l>
          <r>i<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tI</l>
          <r>I<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hi</l>
          <r>i<s n="hpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="í_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>í</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n-í</l>
          <r>í<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nÍ</l>
          <r>Í<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t-í</l>
          <r>í<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tÍ</l>
          <r>Í<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hí</l>
          <r>í<s n="hpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="o_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n-o</l>
          <r>o<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nO</l>
          <r>O<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t-o</l>
          <r>o<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tO</l>
          <r>O<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ho</l>
          <r>o<s n="hpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="cara"><par n="c_init"/><i>a</i><par n="ca/ra__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cat"><par n="c_init"/><i>a</i><par n="ca/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fear"><par n="f_init"/><par n="f/ear__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gnéas"><par n="g_init"/><i>né</i><par n="gné/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bóthar"><par n="b_init"/><i>ó</i><par n="bó/thair__n"/></e>
    <e lm="madra"><par n="m_init"/><i>adra</i><par n="madra/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mála"><par n="m_init"/><i>ála</i><par n="madra/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cailín"><par n="c_init"/><i>ailín</i><par n="madra/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bata"><par n="b_init"/><i>ata</i><par n="madra/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cú"><par n="c_init"/><i>ú</i><par n="cú/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="craic"><par n="c_init"/><i>raic</i><par n="craic/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bainne"><par n="b_init"/><i>ainne</i><par n="bainne/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mí"><par n="m_init"/><i>í</i><par n="mí/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fáinne"><par n="f_init"/><i>áinn</i><par n="fáinn/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oráiste"><par n="o_init"/><i>ráist</i><par n="fáinn/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="páiste"><par n="p_init"/><i>áist</i><par n="fáinn/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abairt"><par n="a_init"/><i>bairt</i><par n="abairt/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="doras"><par n="d_init"/><i>o</i><par n="do/ras__n"/></e>
    <e lm="peann"><par n="p_init"/><par n="p/eann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="airgead"><par n="a_init"/><i>irg</i><par n="airg/ead__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ceol"><par n="c_init"/><i>eo</i><par n="ceo/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="teampall"><par n="t_init"/><i>eampa</i><par n="teampa/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ainm"><par n="a_init"/><i>inm</i><par n="ainm/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="carr"><par n="c_init"/><i>a</i><par n="ca/rr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="athair"><par n="a_init"/><i>th</i><par n="ath/air__n"/></e>
    <e lm="máthair"><par n="m_init"/><i>áth</i><par n="máth/air__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiar"><par n="f_init"/><i>ia</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amadán"><par n="a_init"/><i>madá</i><par n="amadá/n__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iarann"><par n="i_init"/><i>ara</i><par n="iara/nn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mac"><par n="m_init"/><par n="m/ac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="focal"><par n="f_init"/><i>oca</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="asal"><par n="a_init"/><i>sa</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="broc"><par n="b_init"/><i>ro</i><par n="bro/c__n"/></e>
    <e lm="punt"><par n="p_init"/><i>u</i><par n="pu/nt__n"/></e>
